Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4530.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 748a. (1) If there is a compelling need for mental health records or information to determine whether child abuse or child neglect has occurred or to take action to protect a minor where there who may be a at substantial risk of harm, a family independence agency department caseworker or administrator directly involved in the child abuse or child neglect investigation shall notify a mental health professional that the department initiated a child abuse or child neglect investigation has been initiated involving a person an individual who has received services from the mental health professional and shall request, in writing, mental health records and information that are pertinent to that the child abuse or child neglect investigation. Upon receipt of this receiving a notification and request under this subsection, the mental health professional shall review all mental health records and information in the mental health professional's possession to determine if there are mental health records or information that is are pertinent to that the child abuse or child neglect investigation. Within 14 Not later than 7 days after receipt of receiving a request made under this subsection, the mental health professional shall release those the pertinent mental health records and information to the department caseworker or administrator directly involved in the child abuse or child neglect investigation. (2) The following privileges do not apply to mental health records or information to which access is given released under this section: (a) The physician-patient privilege created in section 2157 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2157. (b) The dentist-patient privilege created in section 16648 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16648. (c) The licensed professional counselor-client and limited licensed counselor-client privilege created in section 18117 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18117. (d) The psychologist-patient privilege created in section 18237 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18237. (e) Any other health professional-patient privilege created in or recognized by law. (3) To the extent not protected by the immunity conferred by 1964 PA 170, MCL 691.1401 to 691.1415, 691.1419, an individual who, in good faith, gives access to releases mental health records or information under this section is immune from civil or administrative liability arising from that conduct, unless the conduct was gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct. (4) A duty under this act relating to child abuse and child neglect does not alter a duty imposed under another statute, including, but not limited to, the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.621 to 722.638, regarding the reporting or investigation of child abuse or child neglect. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5220 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.